Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4037
Benefits from governmental programs
or civil or military service.

(1) For purposes of this section, benefits from governmental
programs or civil or military service means any benefit, program, or assistance
provided under a statute or regulation including social security, medicare,
and medicaid.

(2) Unless the power
of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general
authority with respect to benefits from governmental programs or civil or
military service authorizes the agent to:

(a) Execute vouchers in the name of the principal
for allowances and reimbursements payable by the United States or a foreign
government or by a state or subdivision of a state to the principal, including
allowances and reimbursements for transportation of the individuals described
in subdivision (1)(a) of section 30-4036 and for shipment of their household
effects;

(b)
Take possession and order the removal and shipment of property of the principal
from a post, warehouse, depot, dock, or other place of storage or safekeeping,
either governmental or private, and execute and deliver a release, voucher,
receipt, bill of lading, shipping ticket, certificate, or other instrument
for that purpose;

(c)
Enroll in, apply for, select, reject, change, amend, or discontinue, on the
principal's behalf, a benefit or program;

(d) Prepare, file, and maintain a claim of the principal
for a benefit or assistance, financial or otherwise, to which the principal
may be entitled under a statute or regulation;

(e) Initiate, participate in, submit
to alternative dispute resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a
compromise with respect to litigation concerning any benefit or assistance
the principal may be entitled to receive under a statute or regulation; and

(f) Receive the financial
proceeds of a claim described in subdivision (2)(d) of this section and conserve,
invest, disburse, or use for a lawful purpose anything so received.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 37.